District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.26

False representation of authority to practice.

Unless authorized to practice an occupation or profession under this subchapter, a person shall not represent to the public by title, description of services, methods, or procedures, or otherwise that the person is authorized to practice that occupation or profession in the District.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.26.